Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 5.5 Global Warming Index Act

31-5.5-1.
Title.

This act shall be known as the “Global Warming Index Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 218, § 1.

31-5.5-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Motor Vehicle” shall mean a new passenger vehicle, new light-duty truck with a gross vehicle weight of eighty-five hundred pounds (8500 lbs) or less, or any other new vehicle determined by the commissioner to be a vehicle whose primary use is noncommercial personal transportation and which is manufactured for the model year 2010 or subsequent model year; and

“Motor Vehicle global warming gases” or “global warming gases” shall mean carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 218, § 1.

31-5.5-3.
Global warming index stickers.

No model year 2010 or subsequent model year motor vehicle shall be sold or leased in this state unless there is securely and conspicuously affixed in a clearly visible location, a label on which the manufacturer shall endorse clearly, distinctly, and legibly true and correct entries disclosing information concerning the emissions of global warming gases.

The label required by subsection (a) of this section shall include:

A global warming index that contains quantitative information presented in a continuous, easy-to-read scale that compares the emissions of global warming gases from the vehicle with the average projected emissions of global warming gases from all vehicles of the same model year. For reference purposes, the index shall also identify the emissions of global warming gases from the vehicle model of that same model year that has the lowest emissions of global warming gases; and

The use of at least one color ink in addition to black.

A label that complies with the requirements of the California vehicle labeling program shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this title.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a purchaser from removing the label required by this section, after such purchaser has taken possession of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 218, § 1.